Utah statutes.
78A-2-306.   Notice of filing fee -- Consequence of nonpayment.

(1)  When an affidavit of impecuniosity has been filed and the court assesses an initial filing fee, the court shall immediately notify the litigant in writing of:

(a)  the initial filing fee required as a prerequisite to proceeding with the action;

(b)  the procedure available to challenge the initial filing fee assessment as provided in Section 78A-2-307; and

(c)  the inmate's ongoing obligation to make monthly payments until the entire filing fee is paid.

(2)  The court may not authorize service of process or otherwise proceed with the action, except as provided in Section 78A-2-307, until the initial filing fee has been completely paid to the clerk of the court.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

